Utah statutes.
54-4-4.1.   Rules to govern rates.
(1)  The commission may, by rule or order, adopt any method of rate regulation
that is:
(a)  consistent with this title;
(b)  in the public interest; and
(c)  just and reasonable.
(2)  In accordance with Subsection (1), a method of rate regulation may
include:
(a)  rate designs utilizing:
(i)  volumetric rate components;
(ii)  demand rate components;
(iii)  fixed rate components; and
(iv)  variable rate components;
(b)  rate stabilization methods;
(c)  decoupling methods;
(d)  incentive-based mechanisms; and
(e)  other components, methods, or mechanisms approved by the commission.
